Hawaii statutes.
§237D-2 Imposition and rates. (a)
There is levied and shall be assessed and collected each month a tax of:

(1) Five per cent for the period beginning on January
1, 1987, to June 30, 1994;

(2) Six per cent for the period beginning on July 1,
1994, to December 31, 1998;

(3) 7.25 per cent for the period beginning on January
1, 1999, to June 30, 2009;

(4) 8.25 per cent for the period beginning on July 1,
2009, to June 30, 2010; and

(5) 9.25 per cent for the period beginning on July 1,
2010, and thereafter;

on the gross rental or gross rental proceeds derived
from furnishing transient accommodations.

(b) Every operator shall pay to the State the
tax imposed by subsection (a), as provided in this chapter.

(c) There is levied and shall be assessed and
collected each month, on the occupant of a resort time share vacation unit, a
transient accommodations tax of:

(1) 7.25 per cent on the fair market rental value
until December 31, 2015;

(2) 8.25 per cent on the fair market rental value for
the period beginning on January 1, 2016, to December 31, 2016; and

(3) 9.25 per cent on the fair market rental value for
the period beginning on January 1, 2017, and thereafter.

(d) Every plan manager shall be liable for and
pay to the State the transient accommodations tax imposed by subsection (c) as
provided in this chapter. Every resort time share vacation plan shall be
represented by a plan manager who shall be subject to this chapter. [L 1986, c
340, pt of §1; am L 1988, c 241, §3; am L Sp 1993, c 7, §18; am L 1998, c 156,
§16; am L 2009, c 61, §§1, 4; am L 2011, c 103, §1; am L 2013, c 161, §§1, 3;
am L 2015, c 93, §2]

Attorney General Opinions

Rental of hotel rooms to airlines for term of 180 days is not
taxable. Att. Gen. Op. 90-6.

Case Notes

One per cent increase in transient accommodations tax
earmarked for financing expenses associated with convention center development
and construction qualified as a "user tax". 78 H. 157, 890 P.2d
1197.

Previous
Vol04_Ch0201-0257
Next